Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 12
PARKING

Cross references:

For penalties for class A and class B traffic infractions, see § 42-4-1701 (3)(a)(I).

42-4-1201. Starting parked vehicle.

No person shall start a vehicle which is stopped, standing, or parked unless and until such movement can be made with reasonable safety. Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2369, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1101 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-1201 was relocated to § 42-2-128.

42-4-1202. Parking or abandonment of vehicles.

No person shall stop, park, or leave standing any vehicle, either attended or unattended, outside of a business or a residential district, upon the paved or improved and main-traveled part of the highway. Nothing contained in this section shall apply to the driver of any vehicle which is disabled while on the paved or improved and main-traveled portion of a highway in such manner and to such extent that it is impossible to avoid stopping and temporarily leaving such disabled vehicle in such position, subject, when applicable, to the emergency lighting requirements set forth in section 42-4-230.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2369, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1102 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-1202 was relocated to § 42-4-1301.

Cross references:

For transfer and purge of titles of abandoned vehicles, see § 42-4-1810; for criminal penalty for abandonment of a motor vehicle, see § 18-4-512.

42-4-1203. Ski areas to install signs.

Colorado ski areas shall install traffic control signs as provided in this section on both sides of that segment of every highway which is within one mile of and which leads to the recognized entrances to the ski area parking lots if it is found that:

The ski area has insufficient parking capacity as evidenced by the practice of parking by motor vehicles on such highways; and

Such parking constitutes a hazard to traffic or an obstacle to snow removal or the movement or passage of emergency equipment.

The findings required by subsection (1) of this section shall be made by the department of transportation for the state highway system, by the chairman of the board of county commissioners for county roads, and by the chief executive officer of a municipality for a municipal street system. Such findings shall be based upon a traffic investigation.

Such signs shall conform to any and all specifications of the department of transportation adopted pursuant to section 42-4-601. All such signs shall contain a statement that there is no parking allowed on a highway right-of-way so as to obstruct traffic or highway maintenance and that offending vehicles will be towed away.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2370, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1103.1 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-1203 was relocated to § 42-4-1401.

42-4-1204. Stopping, standing, or parking prohibited in specified places.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section, no person shall stop, stand, or park a vehicle, except when necessary to avoid conflict with other traffic or in compliance with the directions of a police officer or an official traffic control device, in any of the following places:

On a sidewalk;

Within an intersection;

On a crosswalk;

Between a safety zone and the adjacent curb or within thirty feet of points on the curb immediately opposite the ends of a safety zone, unless the traffic authority indicates a different length by signs or markings;

Alongside or opposite any street excavation or obstruction when stopping, standing, or parking would obstruct traffic;

On the roadway side of any vehicle stopped or parked at the edge or curb of a street;

Upon any bridge or other elevated structure upon a highway or within a highway tunnel;

On any railroad tracks;

On any controlled-access highway;

In the area between roadways of a divided highway, including crossovers;

At any other place where official signs prohibit stopping.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section, in addition to the restrictions specified in subsection (1) of this section, no person shall stand or park a vehicle, except when necessary to avoid conflict with other traffic or in compliance with the directions of a police officer or an official traffic control device, in any of the following places:

Within five feet of a public or private driveway;

Within fifteen feet of a fire hydrant;

Within twenty feet of a crosswalk at an intersection;

Within thirty feet upon the approach to any flashing beacon or signal, stop sign, yield sign, or traffic control signal located at the side of a roadway;

Within twenty feet of the driveway entrance to any fire station or, on the side of a street opposite the entrance to any fire station, within seventy-five feet of said entrance when properly signposted;

At any other place where official signs prohibit standing.

In addition to the restrictions specified in subsections (1) and (2) of this section, no person shall park a vehicle, except when necessary to avoid conflict with other traffic or in compliance with the directions of a police officer or official traffic control device, in any of the following places:

Within fifty feet of the nearest rail of a railroad crossing;

At any other place where official signs prohibit parking.

Subsection (1)(a) of this section does not prohibit a person from parking a bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, or electric scooter on a sidewalk in accordance with the provisions of section 42-4-1412 (11)(a) and (11)(b).

Subsection (1)(f) of this section does not prohibit persons from parking two or more bicycles, electrical assisted bicycles, or electric scooters abreast in accordance with the provisions of section 42-4-1412 (11)(d).

Subsections (2)(a), (2)(c), and (2)(d) of this section do not apply to a bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, or electric scooter parked on a sidewalk in accordance with section 42-4-1412 (11)(a) and (11)(b).

No person shall move a vehicle not lawfully under such person's control into any such prohibited area or away from a curb such distance as is unlawful.

The department of transportation, with respect to highways under its jurisdiction, may place official traffic control devices prohibiting, limiting, or restricting the stopping, standing, or parking of vehicles on any highway where it is determined, upon the basis of a traffic investigation or study, that such stopping, standing, or parking is dangerous to those using the highway or where the stopping, standing, or parking of vehicles would unduly interfere with the free movement of traffic thereon. No person shall stop, stand, or park any vehicle in violation of the restrictions indicated by such devices.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class B traffic infraction; except that, if a person violates paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of this section and the violation occurs in an unincorporated area of a county, the penalty is fifty dollars.

A political subdivision may not adopt or enforce an ordinance or regulation that prohibits the parking of more than one motorcycle within a space served by a single parking meter.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2370, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 98:

(8) added, p. 1102, § 24, effective June 1.

L. 2009:

(4) amended, (HB 09-1026), ch. 281, p. 1277, § 55, effective October 1.

L. 2012:

(7) amended, (HB 12-1094), ch. 77, p. 258, § 1, effective April 6.

L. 2019:

(4) amended, (HB 19-1221), ch. 271, p. 2561, § 10, effective May 23.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1104 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-1204 was relocated to § 42-4-1402.

42-4-1205. Parking at curb or edge of roadway.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, every vehicle stopped or parked upon a two-way roadway shall be so stopped or parked with the right-hand wheels parallel to and within twelve inches of the right-hand curb or as close as practicable to the right edge of the right-hand shoulder.

Except as otherwise provided by local ordinance, every vehicle stopped or parked upon a one-way roadway shall be so stopped or parked parallel to the curb or edge of the roadway in the direction of authorized traffic movement, with its right-hand wheels within twelve inches of the right-hand curb or as close as practicable to the right edge of the right-hand shoulder or with its left-hand wheels within twelve inches of the left-hand curb or as close as practicable to the left edge of the left-hand shoulder.

Local authorities may by ordinance permit angle parking on any roadway; except that angle parking shall not be permitted on any state highway unless the department of transportation has determined by resolution or order entered in its minutes that the roadway is of sufficient width to permit angle parking without interfering with the free movement of traffic.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2372, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1105 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-1205 was relocated to § 42-4-1403.

42-4-1206. Unattended motor vehicle - definitions.

A person driving or in charge of an unlocked motor vehicle shall not permit it to stand unattended without first stopping the engine, locking the ignition, removing the key from the ignition, and effectively setting the brake thereon. When the vehicle is standing upon any grade, the person shall turn the front wheels to the curb or side of the highway in such a manner as to prevent the vehicle from rolling onto the traveled way.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

The use or operation of a remote starter system or adequate security measures is sufficient to comply with subsection (1) of this section.

As used in this section:

"Adequate security measures" includes, but is not limited to:

Using a vehicle that requires a key to put the vehicle into gear and move the vehicle;

Keeping a keyless start fob out of proximity of the vehicle; or

Employing steering wheel security devices.

"Remote starter system" means a device installed in a motor vehicle that allows the engine of the vehicle to be started by remote or radio control.

Nothing in this section preempts or otherwise impairs the power of local authorities to enforce or enact ordinances or resolutions concerning time limits on the idling of motor vehicles within one year after August 10, 2016.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2372, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2016:

Entire section amended, (HB 16-1122), ch. 62, p. 163, § 1, effective August 10.

L. 2018:

(3) amended, (HB 18-1296), ch. 296, p. 1807, § 1, effective May 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1106 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-1206 was relocated to § 42-4-1404.

42-4-1207. Opening and closing vehicle doors.

No person shall open the door of a motor vehicle on the side available to moving traffic unless and until it is reasonably safe to do so and can be done without interfering with the movement of other traffic; nor shall any person leave a door open on the side of a vehicle available to moving traffic for a period of time longer than necessary to load or unload passengers. Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2372, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1107 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-1207 was relocated to § 42-4-1406.

42-4-1208. Reserved parking for persons with disabilities - applicability - rules.

Definitions. As used in this section:

"Disability" or "disabled" has the same meaning as set forth in section 42-3-204.

"Holder" means a person with a disability who has lawfully obtained an identifying plate or placard.

"Identifying figure" has the same meaning as set forth in section 42-3-204.

"Identifying placard" has the same meaning as set forth in section 42-3-204.

"Identifying plate" has the same meaning as set forth in section 42-3-204.

"Professional" has the same meaning as set forth in section 42-3-204.

"Remuneration-exempt identifying placard" has the same meaning as set forth in section 42-3-204.

"Reserved parking" means a parking space reserved for a person with a disability.

Use of plate or placard.

A person with a disability may use reserved parking on public property or private property if the person displays an identifying plate or placard while using reserved parking.

When an identifying placard is used for reserved parking, the driver of the parked motor vehicle shall ensure that the front of the identifying placard is legible and visible through the windshield when viewed from outside the vehicle. The driver shall hang the placard from the rear-view mirror unless a rear-view mirror is not available or the individual is physically unable to hang the placard from the rear-view mirror. If the tag is not hung from the rear-view mirror, the driver shall display it on the dashboard.

A person with a disability who is a resident of a state other than Colorado may use reserved parking in Colorado if the motor vehicle displays an identifying plate or placard issued by a state other than Colorado, and if:

The identifying plate or placard is currently valid in the state of issuance and meets the requirements of 23 CFR 1235; and

The holder has not been a resident in Colorado for more than ninety days.

A motor vehicle with an identifying plate or a placard may be parked in public parking areas along public streets or in private parking lots regardless of any time limitation imposed upon parking in the area; except that a jurisdiction may specifically limit reserved parking on any public street to no less than four hours. To limit reserved parking, the jurisdiction must clearly post the appropriate time limits in the area. The ability to park notwithstanding parking limitations does not apply to areas in which:

Stopping, standing, or parking of all vehicles is prohibited;

Only special vehicles may be parked; or

Parking is not allowed during specific periods of the day in order to accommodate heavy traffic.

The owner of public or private property may request the installation of official signs or pavement markings identifying reserved parking spaces. The request operates as a waiver of any objection the owner may assert concerning enforcement of this section by a peace officer. An officer may enforce this section on private property notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary.

The number and placement of accessible parking spaces should meet or exceed section 1106 of chapter 11 of the 2012 (second printing) version of the international building code, or any succeeding standard, published by the international code council.

The technical standards for accessible parking spaces should meet or exceed section 502, or any successor section, of the "Accessible and Usable Buildings and Facilities" standard, or any succeeding standard, promulgated and amended from time to time by the international code council (commonly cited as ICC/ANSI A117.1).

Access aisles should post "Wheelchair Access Aisle Absolutely No Parking" sign, which blocks neither the access aisle nor accessible routes.

The technical standards for post- or wall-mounted signs indicating accessible parking spaces and van-accessible parking spaces should meet or exceed section 2B.46 concerning parking, standing, and stopping signs and section 2B.47 concerning design of parking, standing, and stopping of the 2009 version of the manual on uniform traffic control devices, or any succeeding standard, published by the United States federal highway administration.

The owner of real property with multiple-family dwellings affixed and with reserved parking shall retain the reserved parking as commonly owned for the tenants, owners, or visitors of the individual units within the dwellings. This subparagraph (III) does not prohibit the sale of all commonly owned property so long as the reserved parking is not severed from the other elements.

A person shall not impose restrictions on the use of disabled parking unless specifically authorized by a statute of Colorado and a resolution of or ordinance of a political subdivision of Colorado and notice of the restriction is prominently posted by a sign clearly visible at the parking space.

Misuse of reserved parking.

A person without a disability shall not park in a parking space on public or private property that is clearly identified by an official sign or by visible pavement markings as being reserved parking or as being a passenger loading zone unless:

The person is parking the vehicle for the direct benefit of a person with a disability to enter or exit the vehicle while it is parked in the reserved parking space; and

An identifying plate or placard obtained under or authorized by section 42-3-204 is displayed in or on the vehicle if the license plate or placard is currently valid or has expired less than one month before the day the person used the reserved parking.

A person shall not, while parked in a parking space that requires remuneration, display a remuneration-exempt identifying placard that is not issued to the person. A person who possesses a remuneration-exempt identifying placard shall not allow another person to use the placard to park in a parking space that requires remuneration.

A person, after using a reserved parking space that has a time limit, shall not switch motor vehicles or move the motor vehicle to another reserved parking space within one hundred yards of the original parking space within the same eight hours in order to exceed the time limit.

Parking in a time-limited reserved parking space for more than three hours for at least three days a week for at least two weeks creates a rebuttable presumption that the person is violating this paragraph (b).

This subparagraph (II) does not apply to privately owned parking spaces.

A person shall not use reserved parking for a commercial purpose unless:

The purpose relates to transacting business with a business the reserved parking is intended to serve; or

The owner of private property consents to allow the use.

An employee of an entity shall not use an identifying placard issued to the entity unless the employee is transporting persons with disabilities.

For a violation of this paragraph (d), the chief operations officer within Colorado of the entity to whom the placard or plate was issued and the offending employee are each subject to the penalties in section 42-4-1701 (4)(a)(I)(M).

It is an affirmative defense to a violation of this paragraph (d) for the chief operations officer within Colorado that the entity enforces an internal policy controlling access to and use of identifying placards issued to the entity.

If the placard used is expired by operation of section 42-3-204 (6)(f), it is an affirmative defense to a violation of this paragraph (d) that the person did not know the placard was expired if the person who used the placard was the person to whom it was issued.

A person who violates subsection (3)(a) or (3)(a.5) of this section is subject to the penalties in section 42-4-1701 (4)(a)(VIII) and (4)(a)(IX).

A person who violates paragraphs (b) to (d) of this subsection (3) is subject to the penalties in section 42-4-1701 (4)(a)(I)(M).

Blocking access.

Regardless of whether a person displays an identifying plate or placard, a person shall not park a vehicle so as to block reasonable access to curb ramps, passenger loading zones, or accessible routes, as identified in 28 CFR part 36 appendix A, that are clearly identified unless the person is actively loading or unloading a person with a disability.

A person who violates this subsection (4) is subject to the penalties in section 42-4-1701 (4)(a)(VIII).

Fraud and trafficking. A person is subject to the penalties in section 42-4-1701 (4)(a)(X) if the person:

Knowingly and fraudulently obtains, possesses, uses, or transfers an identifying placard issued to a person with a disability;

Knowingly makes, possesses, uses, alters, or transfers what purports to be, but is not, an identifying placard; or

Knowingly creates or uses a device intended to give the impression that it is an identifying placard when viewed from outside the vehicle.

Enforcement of reserved parking.

A peace officer or authorized and uniformed parking enforcement official may check the identification of a person using an identifying plate or placard in order to determine whether the use is authorized.

A peace officer or authorized and uniformed parking enforcement official may confiscate an identifying placard that is being used in violation of this section.

The peace officer or parking enforcement official shall send a confiscated placard to the department unless it is being held as evidence for prosecution of a violation of this section. If the tag is being held as evidence, the peace officer or parking enforcement official shall notify the department of the confiscation and pending charges.

The department shall hold a confiscated placard for thirty days and may dispose of the placard after thirty days. The department shall release the placard to the person with a disability to whom it was issued when the person signs a statement under penalty of perjury that he or she was unaware that the violator used, or intended to use, the placard in violation of this section.

A peace officer and the department may investigate an allegation that a person is violating this section.

A person who observes a violation of this section may submit evidence, including a sworn statement, concerning the violation to any law enforcement agency.

A peace officer may issue a penalty assessment notice for a violation of paragraph (b), (c), or (d) of subsection (3) of this section by sending it by certified mail to the registered owner of the motor vehicle. The peace officer shall include in the penalty assessment notice the offense or infraction, the time and place where it occurred, and a statement that the payment of the penalty assessment and a surcharge is due within twenty days after the issuance of the notice. The department receives payment of the penalty assessment by the due date if the payment is received or postmarked by the twentieth day after the vehicle owner received the penalty assessment notice.

If the penalty assessment and surcharge are not paid within twenty days after the date the vehicle owner receives the assessment notice specified in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (e), the peace officer who issued the original penalty assessment notice shall file a complaint with a court having jurisdiction and issue and serve upon the registered owner of the vehicle a summons to appear in court at the time and place specified.

The entering court shall send certification of the entry of judgment for each violation of paragraph (b), (c), or (d) of subsection (3) of this section to the department.

Upon receipt of certification of an entry of judgment for a violation of paragraph (b), (c), or (d) of subsection (3) of this section, the department shall not register the person's vehicle until all fines imposed for the violations have been paid.

Upon receipt of certification or independent verification of an entry of judgment, the department shall revoke an identifying plate or placard as provided in section 42-3-204 (7)(d).

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, a holder is liable for any penalty or fine as set forth in this section or section 42-3-204 or for any misuse of an identifying plate or placard, including the use of such plate or placard by any person other than a holder, unless the holder furnishes sufficient evidence that the identifying plate or placard was, at the time of the violation, in the care, custody, or control of another person without the holder's knowledge or consent.

A holder may avoid the liability described in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (g) if, within a reasonable time after notification of the violation, the holder furnishes to the prosecutorial division of the appropriate jurisdiction the name and address of the person who had the care, custody, or control of the identifying plate or placard at the time of the violation or the holder reports the license plate or placard lost or stolen to both the appropriate local law enforcement agency and the department.

An employer shall not forbid an employee from reporting violations of this section. A person shall not initiate or administer any disciplinary action against an employee because the employee notified the authorities of a possible violation of this section if the employee has a good-faith belief that a violation has occurred.

A landlord shall not retaliate against a tenant because the tenant notified the authorities of a possible violation of this section if the tenant has a good-faith belief that a violation has occurred.

In order to stop a vehicle from blocking access or illegally using reserved parking, a peace officer may order a vehicle that is used to violate subsection (4) of this section to be towed to an impound lot or a vehicle storage location. The peace officer shall verify that the vehicle has not been stolen and report the tow to the department of revenue in accordance with section 42-4-1804.

The state or local authority issuing a citation under this section, or under any local ordinance defining a substantially equivalent offense, shall transfer one-half of the fine to the state treasurer, who shall credit the fine to the disabled parking education and enforcement fund created in section 42-1-226.

Statewide concern.

The general assembly finds that access to reserved parking by persons with disabilities ensures that those persons have equal access to goods and services essential for daily life.

The general assembly determines that:

Reserved parking for persons with disabilities is a state-administered program and that identifying license plates and placards are issued under state law;

Because local regulations regarding reserved parking for persons with disabilities vary significantly across jurisdictions, they are inconsistent and confusing for persons with disabilities, medical professionals, peace officers, and members of the general public;

Modern life requires travel across multiple local jurisdictions. Inconsistent local marking and enforcement of reserved parking for persons with disabilities confuses people, which prevents them from fully obeying disabled parking regulations;

A message disseminated by one political subdivision of the state using modern communication methods will be received by individuals from multiple political subdivisions. Any attempt to use modern communication methods to educate the public on local regulations governing reserved parking for persons with disabilities will result in public exposure to multiple inconsistent, confusing regulations, so education requires uniform regulation across the state, and a statewide effort is needed to educate the public about disabled parking. This effort is funded by fines that are typically issued by local authorities.

The general assembly therefore declares that access to reserved parking by persons with disabilities is a matter of statewide concern and that the provisions set forth in this section preempt any action contrary to this section if the action is adopted by a political subdivision of the state.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2373, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 98:

(1), IP(2), (3)(a), (4), and (7) amended, p. 216, § 2, effective August 5.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 709, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(1)(a), (1)(b), IP(2), (3)(a), (5)(b), (7), (11), (12)(b), (12)(d), (13)(a), and (13)(b) amended, p. 1175, § 16, effective August 8.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1019), ch. 400, p. 1923, § 3, effective January 1, 2011.

L. 2014:

Entire section R&RE, (HB 14-1029), ch. 252, p. 998, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

(2)(e)(II)(B) amended, (HB 17-1067), ch. 19, p. 64, § 5, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

(1)(f.5) and (3)(a.5) added and (3)(e)(I) amended, (HB 18-1285), ch. 265, p. 1629, § 3, effective January 1, 2019.

L. 2020:

(6)(j) amended, (SB 20-136), ch. 70, p. 299, § 54, effective September 14.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1109 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-1208 was relocated to § 42-4-1407.

Cross references:

(1) For the short title ("The Chris Hinds Act") in HB 18-1285, see section 1 of chapter 265, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

(2) For the legislative declaration in SB 20-136, see section 1 of chapter 70, Session Laws of Colorado 2020.

42-4-1209. Owner liability for parking violations.

In addition to any other liability provided for in this article, the owner of a motor vehicle who is engaged in the business of leasing or renting motor vehicles is liable for payment of a parking violation fine unless the owner of the leased or rented motor vehicle can furnish sufficient evidence that the vehicle was, at the time of the parking violation, in the care, custody, or control of another person. To avoid liability for payment the owner of the motor vehicle is required, within a reasonable time after notification of the parking violation, to furnish to the prosecutorial division of the appropriate jurisdiction the name and address of the person or company who leased, rented, or otherwise had the care, custody, or control of such vehicle. As a condition to avoid liability for payment of a parking violation, any person or company who leases or rents motor vehicles to another person shall attach to the leasing or rental agreement a notice stating that, pursuant to the requirements of this section, the operator of the vehicle is liable for payment of a parking violation fine incurred when the operator has the care, custody, or control of the motor vehicle. The notice shall inform the operator that the operator's name and address shall be furnished to the prosecutorial division of the appropriate jurisdiction when a parking violation fine is incurred by the operator.

The provisions of this section may be adopted by local authorities pursuant to section 42-4-110 (1).

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2375, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1110 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-4-1210. Designated areas on private property for authorized vehicles.

The owner or lessee of any private property available for public use in the unincorporated areas of a county may request in writing that specified areas on such property be designated by the board of county commissioners for use only by authorized vehicles and that said areas, upon acceptance in writing by the board of county commissioners, shall be clearly marked by the owner or lessee with official traffic control devices, as defined in section 42-1-102 (64). Such a request shall be a waiver of any objection the owner or lessee may assert concerning enforcement of this section by peace officers of this state, and such officers are hereby authorized and empowered to so enforce this section, provisions of law to the contrary notwithstanding. When the owner or lessee gives written notice to the board of county commissioners that said request is withdrawn, and the owner or lessee removes all traffic control devices, the provisions of this section shall no longer be applicable.

It is unlawful for any person to park any vehicle other than an authorized vehicle in any area designated and marked for such use as provided in this section.

Any person who violates the provisions of subsection (2) of this section is guilty of a class 2 petty offense and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of twenty-five dollars. The disposition of fines and forfeitures shall be paid into the treasury of the county at such times and in such manner as may be prescribed by the board of county commissioners.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2376, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1111 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-1210 was relocated to § 42-4-314.

42-4-1211. Limitations on backing.

The driver of a vehicle, whether on public property or private property which is used by the general public for parking purposes, shall not back the same unless such movement can be made with safety and without interfering with other traffic.

The driver of a vehicle shall not back the same upon any shoulder or roadway of any controlled-access highway.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2376, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-112 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-1211 was relocated to § 42-4-1304.

42-4-1212. Pay parking access for persons with disabilities.

A person who owns, operates, or manages a parking space that requires remuneration shall not tow, boot, or otherwise take adverse action against an individual or motor vehicle parking in the space for failure to pay the remuneration if the motor vehicle bears a remuneration-exempt identifying placard issued pursuant to section 42-3-204.

Notwithstanding any statute, resolution, or ordinance of the state of Colorado, a political subdivision of Colorado, or a governing board of a state institution of higher education, parking in a space without paying the required remuneration is not a violation of the statute, resolution, or ordinance if the conditions specified in subsection (1) of this section are met.

A law or parking enforcement agency shall withdraw any penalty assessment notice or summons and complaint that is deemed not to be a violation under subsection (2) of this section within five business days after being shown proof that the individual cited has a valid remuneration-exempt identifying placard.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2018.)

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (HB 10-1019), ch. 400, p. 1929, § 4, effective January 1, 2011.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (HB 18-1285), ch. 265, p. 1630, § 4, effective January 1, 2019.

Cross references:

For the short title ("The Chris Hinds Act") in HB 18-1285, see section 1 of chapter 265, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

42-4-1213. Parking in electric motor vehicle charging stations - definition.

For the purposes of this section, "official sign" means a sign identifying a parking space for electric motor vehicle charging that cites this section or the equivalent local ordinance and that clearly displays the penalties for violating this section or the equivalent local ordinance.

The owner of public or private property may install official signs that identify a parking space as a dedicated charging station. The installation operates as a waiver of any objection the owner may assert concerning enforcement of this section by a peace officer. A peace officer may enforce this section on private property.

A person shall not park a motor vehicle within a parking space designated for charging a plug-in electric motor vehicle unless the motor vehicle is a plug-in electric motor vehicle.

Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a person shall not park a plug-in electric motor vehicle in a parking space with a dedicated charging connector for the parking space unless the person is parked in the charging station for the purpose of charging the plug-in electric motor vehicle.

A plug-in electric motor vehicle is rebuttably presumed to not be charging if the motor vehicle is:

Parked in a charging station parking space with a dedicated charging connector for the space; and

Not continuously and electrically connected to the charger for longer than thirty minutes.

Between the hours of 11 p.m. and 5 a.m.

A person may park a plug-in electric motor vehicle at a charging station after the motor vehicle is fully charged in a parking lot:

(I) That serves a lodging business if the person is a client of the lodging business and has parked the plug-in electric motor vehicle in the lot to charge overnight;

(II) That serves an airport if the person is a client of the airport and has parked the plug-in electric motor vehicle in the lot to charge when traveling; or

The exception in subsection (3)(a) of this section is an affirmative defense to a violation of subsection (2) of this section.

A person who violates this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (HB 19-1298), ch. 384, p. 3439, § 3, effective August 2.